Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4899.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 17213. (1) Notwithstanding section 16145 or section 16174(1)(c) or rules promulgated pursuant to under either of those sections, the board may grant a license to an applicant applying for initial licensure as a registered professional nurse who is a graduate of a nurse education program that is located outside of the United States if he or she the applicant meets the requirements of section 16174 and satisfies each of the following: (a) Provides verification that the nurse education program from which he or she the applicant graduated is substantially equivalent to the nursing education programs in this state that are approved by the board. In determining whether an applicant has met the requirements described in this subdivision, the board shall accept a verification from the National Association of Credential Evaluation Services, the Commission on Graduates of Foreign Nursing Schools, and any equivalent organization as determined by the board. (b) Has passed the requisite examination for licensure as a registered professional nurse, as approved by the board. (2) Notwithstanding section 16145 or section 16174(1)(c) or rules promulgated pursuant to under either of those sections, the board may grant a license to an applicant applying for licensure as a registered professional nurse who is licensed in another state or, until January 1, 2012, is licensed in a province of Canada and who is a graduate of a nurse education program located outside of the United States and Canada if he or she the applicant meets the requirements of subsection (1) and provides verification of licensure or registration in each state, country, jurisdiction, territory, and province in which he or she the applicant is currently licensed or registered or has been licensed or registered. If the applicant seeking licensure under this subsection has, for at least 5 years immediately preceding the application, maintained an active license or registration in another state with no disciplinary sanctions, then the applicant does not have to provide the verification required under subsection (1)(a).